Illinois, session 104th, SB1461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-110.10, 7-139.8, 7-139.14, 14-110, and 614-152.1 as follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/3-110.10)8    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-857)9    Sec. 3-110.10. Transfer from Article 7. Until January 1, 102009, a person may transfer to a fund established under this 11Article up to 8 years of creditable service accumulated under 12Article 7 of this Code upon payment to the fund of an amount to 13be determined by the board, equal to (i) the difference 14between the amount of employee and employer contributions 15transferred to the fund under Section 7-139.11 and the amounts 16that would have been contributed had such contributions been 17made at the rates applicable to an employee under this 18Article, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially assumed 19rate, compounded annually, from the date of service to the 20date of payment.21    A No later than 6 months after July 23, 2021 (the effective 22date of Public Act 102-113), a person may transfer to a fund 23established under this Article creditable service accumulated   SB1461- 2 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1under Article 7 of this Code for service as a sheriff's law 2enforcement employee, county correctional officer, person 3employed by a participating municipality to perform police 4duties, or law enforcement officer employed on a full-time 5basis by a forest preserve district, person employed by a 6participating municipality or instrumentality to perform 7administrative duties related to law enforcement, investigator 8for the Secretary of State, or conservation police officer 9upon payment to the fund of an amount to be determined by the 10board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 11employee and employer contributions transferred to the fund 12under Section 7-139.14 and the amounts that would have been 13contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 14applicable to an employee under this Article, plus (ii) 15interest thereon at the actuarially assumed rate, compounded 16annually, from the date of service to the date of payment. 17    No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, a person may 19transfer to a fund established under this Article creditable 20service accumulated under Article 7 of this Code for service 21as a county correctional officer or as a person employed by a 22participating municipality to perform administrative duties 23related to law enforcement upon payment to the fund of an 24amount to be determined by the board, equal to (i) the 25difference between the amount of employee and employer 26contributions transferred to the fund under Section 7-139.14   SB1461- 3 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 2contributions been made at the rates applicable to an employee 3under this Article, plus (ii) interest thereon at the 4actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from the date 5of service to the date of payment. 6(Source: P.A. 102-113, eff. 7-23-21; 102-857, eff. 5-13-22.) 7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-1061)8    Sec. 3-110.10. Transfer from Article 7. Until January 1, 92009, a person may transfer to a fund established under this 10Article up to 8 years of creditable service accumulated under 11Article 7 of this Code upon payment to the fund of an amount to 12be determined by the board, equal to (i) the difference 13between the amount of employee and employer contributions 14transferred to the fund under Section 7-139.11 and the amounts 15that would have been contributed had such contributions been 16made at the rates applicable to an employee under this 17Article, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially assumed 18rate, compounded annually, from the date of service to the 19date of payment.20    A No later than September 30, 2023, a person may transfer 21to a fund established under this Article creditable service 22accumulated under Article 7 of this Code for service as a 23sheriff's law enforcement employee, county correctional 24officer, person employed by a participating municipality to 25perform police duties, law enforcement officer employed on a   SB1461- 4 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1full-time basis by a forest preserve district, or person 2employed by a participating municipality or instrumentality to 3perform administrative duties related to law enforcement, 4investigator for the Secretary of State, or conservation 5police officer upon payment to the fund of an amount to be 6determined by the board, equal to (i) the difference between 7the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 8to the fund under Section 7-139.14 and the amounts that would 9have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 10rates applicable to an employee under this Article, plus (ii) 11interest thereon at the actuarially assumed rate, compounded 12annually, from the date of service to the date of payment. 13(Source: P.A. 102-113, eff. 7-23-21; 102-1061, eff. 1-1-23.) 14    (40 ILCS 5/7-139.8)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-139.8)15    Sec. 7-139.8. Transfer to Article 14 System. 16    (a) Any active member of the State Employees' Retirement 17System who is a State policeman, an investigator for the 18Secretary of State, a conservation police officer, an 19investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, an 20investigator for the Department of Revenue, an investigator 21for the Illinois Gaming Board, an arson investigator, a 22Commerce Commission police officer, an investigator for the 23Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, or a 24controlled substance inspector may apply for transfer of some 25or all of his or her credits and creditable service   SB1461- 5 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1accumulated in this Fund for service as a sheriff's law 2enforcement employee, person employed by a participating 3municipality to perform police duties, or law enforcement 4officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest preserve 5district to the State Employees' Retirement System in 6accordance with Section 14-110. Any active member of the State 7Employees' Retirement System who is entitled to eligible 8creditable service under Section 14-110 may apply for transfer 9of up to 7 years of credits and creditable service accumulated 10in this Fund for service as a State's Attorney. The creditable 11service shall be transferred only upon payment by this Fund to 12the State Employees' Retirement System of an amount equal to:13        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 14    applicant for the service to be transferred, including 15    interest; and16        (2) municipality credits based on such service, 17    including interest; and18        (3) any interest paid by the applicant to reinstate 19    such service.20Participation in this Fund as to any credits transferred under 21this Section shall terminate on the date of transfer.22    (b) Any person applying to transfer service under this 23Section may reinstate credits and creditable service 24terminated upon receipt of a separation benefit, by paying to 25the Fund the amount of the separation benefit plus interest 26thereon at the actuarially assumed rate of interest to the   SB1461- 6 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1date of payment.2(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-856, eff. 1-1-23.) 3    (40 ILCS 5/7-139.14)4    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-857)5    Sec. 7-139.14. Transfer to Article 3 pension fund.6    (a) An Within 6 months after July 23, 2021 (the effective 7date of Public Act 102-113), an active member of a pension fund 8established under Article 3 of this Code may apply for 9transfer to that Article 3 pension fund of his or her credits 10and creditable service accumulated in this Fund for service as 11a sheriff's law enforcement employee, county correctional 12officer, person employed by a participating municipality to 13perform police duties, or law enforcement officer employed on 14a full-time basis by a forest preserve district, person 15employed by a participating municipality or instrumentality to 16perform administrative duties related to law enforcement, 17investigator for the Secretary of State, or conservation 18police officer. The creditable service shall be transferred 19only upon payment by this Fund to such Article 3 pension fund 20of an amount equal to:21        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 22    applicant for the service to be transferred, including 23    interest; and24        (2) an amount representing employer contributions, 25    equal to the total amount determined under item (1); and  SB1461- 7 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (3) any interest paid by the applicant to reinstate 2    such service.3    Within 6 months after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, an active member 5of a pension fund established under Article 3 of this Code may 6apply for transfer to that Article 3 pension fund of his or her 7credits and creditable service accumulated in this Fund for 8service as a county correctional officer or as a person 9employed by a participating municipality to perform 10administrative duties related to law enforcement. The 11creditable service shall be transferred only upon payment by 12this Fund to such Article 3 pension fund of an amount equal to: 13        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 14    applicant for the service to be transferred, including 15    interest; and 16        (2) an amount representing employer contributions, 17    equal to the total amount determined under item (1); and 18        (3) any interest paid by the applicant to reinstate 19    such service. 20    Participation in this Fund as to any credits transferred 21under this Section shall terminate on the date of transfer.22    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, any 23person applying to transfer service under this Section may 24reinstate credits and creditable service terminated upon 25receipt of a separation benefit by paying to the Fund the 26amount of the separation benefit plus interest thereon at the   SB1461- 8 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1actuarially assumed rate of interest to the date of payment. 2Such payment must be made within 90 days after notification by 3the Fund of the cost of such reinstatement.4(Source: P.A. 102-113, eff. 7-23-21; 102-857, eff. 5-13-22.) 5    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-1061)6    Sec. 7-139.14. Transfer to Article 3 pension fund.7    (a) An No later than June 30, 2023, an active member of a 8pension fund established under Article 3 of this Code may 9apply for transfer to that Article 3 pension fund of his or her 10credits and creditable service accumulated in this Fund for 11service as a sheriff's law enforcement employee, county 12correctional officer, person employed by a participating 13municipality to perform police duties, law enforcement officer 14employed on a full-time basis by a forest preserve district, 15or person employed by a participating municipality or 16instrumentality to perform administrative duties related to 17law enforcement, investigator for the Secretary of State, or 18conservation police officer. The creditable service shall be 19transferred only upon payment by this Fund to such Article 3 20pension fund of an amount equal to:21        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 22    applicant for the service to be transferred, including 23    interest; and24        (2) an amount representing employer contributions, 25    equal to the total amount determined under item (1); and  SB1461- 9 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (3) any interest paid by the applicant to reinstate 2    such service.3    Participation in this Fund as to any credits transferred 4under this Section shall terminate on the date of transfer.5    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, any 6person applying to transfer service under this Section may 7reinstate credits and creditable service terminated upon 8receipt of a separation benefit by paying to the Fund the 9amount of the separation benefit plus interest thereon at the 10actuarially assumed rate of interest to the date of payment. 11Such payment must be made within 90 60 days after notification 12by the Fund of the cost of such reinstatement.13(Source: P.A. 102-113, eff. 7-23-21; 102-1061, eff. 1-1-23.) 14    (40 ILCS 5/14-110)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 14-110)15    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-813 and 103-34)16    Sec. 14-110. Alternative retirement annuity. 17    (a) Any member who has withdrawn from service with not 18less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 19attained age 55, and any member who has withdrawn from service 20with not less than 25 years of eligible creditable service and 21has attained age 50, regardless of whether the attainment of 22either of the specified ages occurs while the member is still 23in service, shall be entitled to receive at the option of the 24member, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 25a retirement annuity computed as follows:  SB1461- 10 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (i) for periods of service as a noncovered employee: 2    if retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001, 3% of 3    final average compensation for each year of creditable 4    service; if retirement occurs before January 1, 2001, 2 5    1/4% of final average compensation for each of the first 6    10 years of creditable service, 2 1/2% for each year above 7    10 years to and including 20 years of creditable service, 8    and 2 3/4% for each year of creditable service above 20 9    years; and10        (ii) for periods of eligible creditable service as a 11    covered employee: if retirement occurs on or after January 12    1, 2001, 2.5% of final average compensation for each year 13    of creditable service; if retirement occurs before January 14    1, 2001, 1.67% of final average compensation for each of 15    the first 10 years of such service, 1.90% for each of the 16    next 10 years of such service, 2.10% for each year of such 17    service in excess of 20 but not exceeding 30, and 2.30% for 18    each year in excess of 30.19    Such annuity shall be subject to a maximum of 75% of final 20average compensation if retirement occurs before January 1, 212001 or to a maximum of 80% of final average compensation if 22retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001.23    These rates shall not be applicable to any service 24performed by a member as a covered employee which is not 25eligible creditable service. Service as a covered employee 26which is not eligible creditable service shall be subject to   SB1461- 11 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1the rates and provisions of Section 14-108.2    (b) For the purpose of this Section, "eligible creditable 3service" means creditable service resulting from service in 4one or more of the following positions:5        (1) State policeman;6        (2) fire fighter in the fire protection service of a 7    department;8        (3) air pilot;9        (4) special agent;10        (5) investigator for the Secretary of State;11        (6) conservation police officer;12        (7) investigator for the Department of Revenue or the 13    Illinois Gaming Board;14        (8) security employee of the Department of Human 15    Services;16        (9) Central Management Services security police 17    officer;18        (10) security employee of the Department of 19    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;20        (11) dangerous drugs investigator;21        (12) investigator for the Illinois State Police;22        (13) investigator for the Office of the Attorney 23    General;24        (14) controlled substance inspector;25        (15) investigator for the Office of the State's 26    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor;  SB1461- 12 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (16) Commerce Commission police officer;2        (17) arson investigator;3        (18) State highway maintenance worker;4        (19) security employee of the Department of Innovation 5    and Technology; or 6        (20) transferred employee. 7    A person employed in one of the positions specified in 8this subsection is entitled to eligible creditable service for 9service credit earned under this Article while undergoing the 10basic police training course approved by the Illinois Law 11Enforcement Training Standards Board, if completion of that 12training is required of persons serving in that position. For 13the purposes of this Code, service during the required basic 14police training course shall be deemed performance of the 15duties of the specified position, even though the person is 16not a sworn peace officer at the time of the training.17    A person under paragraph (20) is entitled to eligible 18creditable service for service credit earned under this 19Article on and after his or her transfer by Executive Order No. 202003-10, Executive Order No. 2004-2, or Executive Order No. 212016-1. 22    (c) For the purposes of this Section:23        (1) The term "State policeman" includes any title or 24    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 25    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.26        (2) The term "fire fighter in the fire protection   SB1461- 13 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    service of a department" includes all officers in such 2    fire protection service including fire chiefs and 3    assistant fire chiefs.4        (3) The term "air pilot" includes any employee whose 5    official job description on file in the Department of 6    Central Management Services, or in the department by which 7    he is employed if that department is not covered by the 8    Personnel Code, states that his principal duty is the 9    operation of aircraft, and who possesses a pilot's 10    license; however, the change in this definition made by 11    Public Act 83-842 shall not operate to exclude any 12    noncovered employee who was an "air pilot" for the 13    purposes of this Section on January 1, 1984.14        (4) The term "special agent" means any person who by 15    reason of employment by the Division of Narcotic Control, 16    the Bureau of Investigation or, after July 1, 1977, the 17    Division of Criminal Investigation, the Division of 18    Internal Investigation, the Division of Operations, the 19    Division of Patrol, or any other Division or 20    organizational entity in the Illinois State Police is 21    vested by law with duties to maintain public order, 22    investigate violations of the criminal law of this State, 23    enforce the laws of this State, make arrests and recover 24    property. The term "special agent" includes any title or 25    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 26    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.  SB1461- 14 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (5) The term "investigator for the Secretary of State" 2    means any person employed by the Office of the Secretary 3    of State and vested with such investigative duties as 4    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 5    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 6    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.7        A person who became employed as an investigator for 8    the Secretary of State between January 1, 1967 and 9    December 31, 1975, and who has served as such until 10    attainment of age 60, either continuously or with a single 11    break in service of not more than 3 years duration, which 12    break terminated before January 1, 1976, shall be entitled 13    to have his retirement annuity calculated in accordance 14    with subsection (a), notwithstanding that he has less than 15    20 years of credit for such service.16        (6) The term "Conservation Police Officer" means any 17    person employed by the Division of Law Enforcement of the 18    Department of Natural Resources and vested with such law 19    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 20    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 21    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The 22    term "Conservation Police Officer" includes the positions 23    of Chief Conservation Police Administrator and Assistant 24    Conservation Police Administrator.25        (7) The term "investigator for the Department of 26    Revenue" means any person employed by the Department of   SB1461- 15 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    Revenue and vested with such investigative duties as 2    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 3    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 4    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.5        The term "investigator for the Illinois Gaming Board" 6    means any person employed as such by the Illinois Gaming 7    Board and vested with such peace officer duties as render 8    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 9    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 10    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. 11        (8) The term "security employee of the Department of 12    Human Services" means any person employed by the 13    Department of Human Services who (i) is employed at the 14    Chester Mental Health Center and has daily contact with 15    the residents thereof, (ii) is employed within a security 16    unit at a facility operated by the Department and has 17    daily contact with the residents of the security unit, 18    (iii) is employed at a facility operated by the Department 19    that includes a security unit and is regularly scheduled 20    to work at least 50% of his or her working hours within 21    that security unit, or (iv) is a mental health police 22    officer. "Mental health police officer" means any person 23    employed by the Department of Human Services in a position 24    pertaining to the Department's mental health and 25    developmental disabilities functions who is vested with 26    such law enforcement duties as render the person   SB1461- 16 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 2    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 3    218(l)(1) of that Act. "Security unit" means that portion 4    of a facility that is devoted to the care, containment, 5    and treatment of persons committed to the Department of 6    Human Services as sexually violent persons, persons unfit 7    to stand trial, or persons not guilty by reason of 8    insanity. With respect to past employment, references to 9    the Department of Human Services include its predecessor, 10    the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 11    Disabilities.12        The changes made to this subdivision (c)(8) by Public 13    Act 92-14 apply to persons who retire on or after January 14    1, 2001, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1.15        (9) "Central Management Services security police 16    officer" means any person employed by the Department of 17    Central Management Services who is vested with such law 18    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 19    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 20    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.21        (10) For a member who first became an employee under 22    this Article before July 1, 2005, the term "security 23    employee of the Department of Corrections or the 24    Department of Juvenile Justice" means any employee of the 25    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 26    Justice or the former Department of Personnel, and any   SB1461- 17 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    member or employee of the Prisoner Review Board, who has 2    daily contact with inmates or youth by working within a 3    correctional facility or Juvenile facility operated by the 4    Department of Juvenile Justice or who is a parole officer 5    or an employee who has direct contact with committed 6    persons in the performance of his or her job duties. For a 7    member who first becomes an employee under this Article on 8    or after July 1, 2005, the term means an employee of the 9    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 10    Justice who is any of the following: (i) officially 11    headquartered at a correctional facility or Juvenile 12    facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 13    (ii) a parole officer, (iii) a member of the apprehension 14    unit, (iv) a member of the intelligence unit, (v) a member 15    of the sort team, or (vi) an investigator.16        (11) The term "dangerous drugs investigator" means any 17    person who is employed as such by the Department of Human 18    Services.19        (12) The term "investigator for the Illinois State 20    Police" means a person employed by the Illinois State 21    Police who is vested under Section 4 of the Narcotic 22    Control Division Abolition Act with such law enforcement 23    powers as render him ineligible for coverage under the 24    Social Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 25    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.26        (13) "Investigator for the Office of the Attorney   SB1461- 18 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    General" means any person who is employed as such by the 2    Office of the Attorney General and is vested with such 3    investigative duties as render him ineligible for coverage 4    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 5    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. For 6    the period before January 1, 1989, the term includes all 7    persons who were employed as investigators by the Office 8    of the Attorney General, without regard to social security 9    status.10        (14) "Controlled substance inspector" means any person 11    who is employed as such by the Department of Professional 12    Regulation and is vested with such law enforcement duties 13    as render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 14    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 15    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The term 16    "controlled substance inspector" includes the Program 17    Executive of Enforcement and the Assistant Program 18    Executive of Enforcement.19        (15) The term "investigator for the Office of the 20    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor" means a person 21    employed in that capacity on a full-time basis under the 22    authority of Section 7.06 of the State's Attorneys 23    Appellate Prosecutor's Act.24        (16) "Commerce Commission police officer" means any 25    person employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission who is 26    vested with such law enforcement duties as render him   SB1461- 19 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 2    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 3    218(l)(1) of that Act.4        (17) "Arson investigator" means any person who is 5    employed as such by the Office of the State Fire Marshal 6    and is vested with such law enforcement duties as render 7    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 8    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 9    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. A person who was 10    employed as an arson investigator on January 1, 1995 and 11    is no longer in service but not yet receiving a retirement 12    annuity may convert his or her creditable service for 13    employment as an arson investigator into eligible 14    creditable service by paying to the System the difference 15    between the employee contributions actually paid for that 16    service and the amounts that would have been contributed 17    if the applicant were contributing at the rate applicable 18    to persons with the same social security status earning 19    eligible creditable service on the date of application.20        (18) The term "State highway maintenance worker" means 21    a person who is either of the following:22            (i) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 23        Illinois Department of Transportation in the position 24        of highway maintainer, highway maintenance lead 25        worker, highway maintenance lead/lead worker, heavy 26        construction equipment operator, power shovel   SB1461- 20 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        operator, or bridge mechanic; and whose principal 2        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 3        actual maintenance necessary to keep the highways that 4        form a part of the State highway system in serviceable 5        condition for vehicular traffic.6            (ii) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 7        Illinois State Toll Highway Authority in the position 8        of equipment operator/laborer H-4, equipment 9        operator/laborer H-6, welder H-4, welder H-6, 10        mechanical/electrical H-4, mechanical/electrical H-6, 11        water/sewer H-4, water/sewer H-6, sign maker/hanger 12        H-4, sign maker/hanger H-6, roadway lighting H-4, 13        roadway lighting H-6, structural H-4, structural H-6, 14        painter H-4, or painter H-6; and whose principal 15        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 16        actual maintenance necessary to keep the Authority's 17        tollways in serviceable condition for vehicular 18        traffic.19        (19) The term "security employee of the Department of 20    Innovation and Technology" means a person who was a 21    security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 22    Department of Juvenile Justice, was transferred to the 23    Department of Innovation and Technology pursuant to 24    Executive Order 2016-01, and continues to perform similar 25    job functions under that Department. 26        (20) "Transferred employee" means an employee who was   SB1461- 21 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    transferred to the Department of Central Management 2    Services by Executive Order No. 2003-10 or Executive Order 3    No. 2004-2 or transferred to the Department of Innovation 4    and Technology by Executive Order No. 2016-1, or both, and 5    was entitled to eligible creditable service for services 6    immediately preceding the transfer. 7        (21) "State's Attorney" means a person elected or 8    appointed to serve as the State's Attorney of a county. 9    "State's Attorney" does not include an assistant State's 10    Attorney or a State's Attorney special investigator. 11    (d) A security employee of the Department of Corrections 12or the Department of Juvenile Justice, a security employee of 13the Department of Human Services who is not a mental health 14police officer, and a security employee of the Department of 15Innovation and Technology shall not be eligible for the 16alternative retirement annuity provided by this Section unless 17he or she meets the following minimum age and service 18requirements at the time of retirement:19        (i) 25 years of eligible creditable service and age 20    55; or21        (ii) beginning January 1, 1987, 25 years of eligible 22    creditable service and age 54, or 24 years of eligible 23    creditable service and age 55; or24        (iii) beginning January 1, 1988, 25 years of eligible 25    creditable service and age 53, or 23 years of eligible 26    creditable service and age 55; or  SB1461- 22 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (iv) beginning January 1, 1989, 25 years of eligible 2    creditable service and age 52, or 22 years of eligible 3    creditable service and age 55; or4        (v) beginning January 1, 1990, 25 years of eligible 5    creditable service and age 51, or 21 years of eligible 6    creditable service and age 55; or7        (vi) beginning January 1, 1991, 25 years of eligible 8    creditable service and age 50, or 20 years of eligible 9    creditable service and age 55.10    Persons who have service credit under Article 16 of this 11Code for service as a security employee of the Department of 12Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 13Department of Human Services in a position requiring 14certification as a teacher may count such service toward 15establishing their eligibility under the service requirements 16of this Section; but such service may be used only for 17establishing such eligibility, and not for the purpose of 18increasing or calculating any benefit.19    (e) If a member enters military service while working in a 20position in which eligible creditable service may be earned, 21and returns to State service in the same or another such 22position, and fulfills in all other respects the conditions 23prescribed in this Article for credit for military service, 24such military service shall be credited as eligible creditable 25service for the purposes of the retirement annuity prescribed 26in this Section.  SB1461- 23 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    (f) For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 2this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 31968 and before October 1, 1975 as a covered employee in the 4position of special agent, conservation police officer, mental 5health police officer, or investigator for the Secretary of 6State, shall be deemed to have been service as a noncovered 7employee, provided that the employee pays to the System prior 8to retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between 9the employee contributions that would have been required for 10such service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of 11employee contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is 12made after July 31, 1987, regular interest on the amount 13specified in item (1) from the date of service to the date of 14payment.15    For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 16this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 171968 and before January 1, 1982 as a covered employee in the 18position of investigator for the Department of Revenue shall 19be deemed to have been service as a noncovered employee, 20provided that the employee pays to the System prior to 21retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between the 22employee contributions that would have been required for such 23service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of employee 24contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is made after 25January 1, 1990, regular interest on the amount specified in 26item (1) from the date of service to the date of payment.  SB1461- 24 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    (g) A State policeman may elect, not later than January 1, 21990, to establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 3years of his service as a policeman under Article 3, by filing 4a written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of 5an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (i) the 6difference between the amount of employee and employer 7contributions transferred to the System under Section 3-110.5, 8and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 9contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 10policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 11for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 12to the date of payment.13    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 14policeman may elect, not later than July 1, 1993, to establish 15eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of his service 16as a member of the County Police Department under Article 9, by 17filing a written election with the Board, accompanied by 18payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to 19(i) the difference between the amount of employee and employer 20contributions transferred to the System under Section 9-121.10 21and the amounts that would have been contributed had those 22contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 23policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 24for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 25to the date of payment.26    (h) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State   SB1461- 25 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1policeman or investigator for the Secretary of State may elect 2to establish eligible creditable service for up to 12 years of 3his service as a policeman under Article 5, by filing a written 4election with the Board on or before January 31, 1992, and 5paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 6determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 7the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 8to the System under Section 5-236, and the amounts that would 9have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 10rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 11thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 12annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.13    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 14policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 15the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 16creditable service for up to 10 years of service as a sheriff's 17law enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 18election with the Board on or before January 31, 1993, and 19paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 20determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 21the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 22to the System under Section 7-139.7, and the amounts that 23would have been contributed had such contributions been made 24at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 25thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 26annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.  SB1461- 26 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 2policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 3the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 4creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a police 5officer under Article 3, a policeman under Article 5, a 6sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7, a member 7of the county police department under Article 9, or a police 8officer under Article 15 by filing a written election with the 9Board and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 10the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 11employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 12under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, 9-121.10, or 15-134.4 13and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 14contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 15policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 16for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 17to the date of payment.18    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 19investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, or an 20investigator for the Department of Revenue, may elect to 21establish eligible creditable service for up to 5 years of 22service as a police officer under Article 3, a policeman under 23Article 5, a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 247, or a member of the county police department under Article 9 25by filing a written election with the Board within 6 months 26after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act   SB1461- 27 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b196-745) and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 2the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 3employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 4under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, or 9-121.10 and the 5amounts that would have been contributed had such 6contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 7policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 8assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 9of service to the date of payment.10    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 11policeman, conservation police officer, investigator for the 12Office of the Attorney General, an investigator for the 13Department of Revenue, or investigator for the Secretary of 14State may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 15up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 16participating municipality to perform police duties, or law 17enforcement officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest 18preserve district under Article 7, a county corrections 19officer, or a court services officer under Article 9, by 20filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 21August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-745) and 22paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board, 23equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 24employer contributions transferred to the System under 25Sections 7-139.8 and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have 26been contributed had such contributions been made at the rates   SB1461- 28 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at 2the actuarially assumed rate for each year, compounded 3annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.4    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 5policeman, arson investigator, or Commerce Commission police 6officer may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 7up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 8participating municipality to perform police duties under 9Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court services 10officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under Article 4 by 11filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 12July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 13paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 14equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 15employer contributions transferred to the System under 16Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 and the amounts that 17would have been contributed had such contributions been made 18at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 19thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for each year, 20compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 21payment. 22    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 23conservation police officer may elect to establish eligible 24creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person 25employed by a participating municipality to perform police 26duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, or a   SB1461- 29 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1court services officer under Article 9 by filing a written 2election with the Board within 6 months after July 30, 2021 3(the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to the 4System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) the 5difference between the amount of employee and employer 6contributions transferred to the System under Sections 7-139.8 7and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have been contributed 8had such contributions been made at the rates applicable to 9State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 10assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 11of service to the date of payment. 12    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), a State 13policeman or conservation police officer may elect to convert 14service credit earned under this Article to eligible 15creditable service, as defined by this Section, by filing a 16written election with the Board board within 6 months after 17July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 18paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 19equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee 20contributions originally paid for that service and the amounts 21that would have been contributed had such contributions been 22made at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) the 23difference between the employer's normal cost of the credit 24prior to the conversion authorized by the amendatory Act of 25the 104th General Assembly Public Act 102-210 and the 26employer's normal cost of the credit converted in accordance   SB1461- 30 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1with this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly Public 2Act 102-210, plus (iii) interest thereon at the actuarially 3assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 4of service to the date of payment. 5    (i) The total amount of eligible creditable service 6established by any person under subsections (g), (h), (j), 7(k), (l), (l-5), and (o), and (q) of this Section shall not 8exceed 12 years.9    (j) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 10investigator for the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 11Prosecutor or a controlled substance inspector may elect to 12establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of 13his service as a policeman under Article 3 or a sheriff's law 14enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 15election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an amount 16to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) the difference 17between the amount of employee and employer contributions 18transferred to the System under Section 3-110.6 or 7-139.8, 19and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 20contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 21policemen, plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 22each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 23the date of payment.24    (k) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 25Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 26establish eligible creditable service for periods spent as a   SB1461- 31 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1full-time law enforcement officer or full-time corrections 2officer employed by the federal government or by a state or 3local government located outside of Illinois, for which credit 4is not held in any other public employee pension fund or 5retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 6file a written application with the Board by March 31, 1998, 7accompanied by evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board 8and payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal 9to (1) employee contributions for the credit being 10established, based upon the applicant's salary on the first 11day as an alternative formula employee after the employment 12for which credit is being established and the rates then 13applicable to alternative formula employees, plus (2) an 14amount determined by the Board to be the employer's normal 15cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being established, 16plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items (1) and (2) 17from the first day as an alternative formula employee after 18the employment for which credit is being established to the 19date of payment.20    (l) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 21security employee of the Department of Corrections may elect, 22not later than July 1, 1998, to establish eligible creditable 23service for up to 10 years of his or her service as a policeman 24under Article 3, by filing a written election with the Board, 25accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined by the 26Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of   SB1461- 32 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 2under Section 3-110.5, and the amounts that would have been 3contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 4applicable to security employees of the Department of 5Corrections, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 6for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 7to the date of payment.8    (l-5) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 9Section, a State policeman may elect to establish eligible 10creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a full-time 11law enforcement officer employed by the federal government or 12by a state or local government located outside of Illinois for 13which credit is not held in any other public employee pension 14fund or retirement system. To obtain this credit, the 15applicant must file a written application with the Board no 16later than 3 years after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 17Public Act 101-610), accompanied by evidence of eligibility 18acceptable to the Board and payment of an amount to be 19determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee contributions 20for the credit being established, based upon the applicant's 21salary on the first day as an alternative formula employee 22after the employment for which credit is being established and 23the rates then applicable to alternative formula employees, 24plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be the employer's 25normal cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being 26established, plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items   SB1461- 33 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1(1) and (2) from the first day as an alternative formula 2employee after the employment for which credit is being 3established to the date of payment. 4    (m) The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public 5Act 94-696 apply only to: (1) security employees of the 6Department of Juvenile Justice employed by the Department of 7Corrections before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public 8Act 94-696) and transferred to the Department of Juvenile 9Justice by Public Act 94-696; and (2) persons employed by the 10Department of Juvenile Justice on or after June 1, 2006 (the 11effective date of Public Act 94-696) who are required by 12subsection (b) of Section 3-2.5-15 of the Unified Code of 13Corrections to have any bachelor's or advanced degree from an 14accredited college or university or, in the case of persons 15who provide vocational training, who are required to have 16adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 17the vocational training. 18    (n) A person employed in a position under subsection (b) 19of this Section who has purchased service credit under 20subsection (j) of Section 14-104 or subsection (b) of Section 2114-105 in any other capacity under this Article may convert up 22to 5 years of that service credit into service credit covered 23under this Section by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) 24the additional employee contribution required under Section 2514-133, plus (2) the additional employer contribution required 26under Section 14-131, plus (3) interest on items (1) and (2) at   SB1461- 34 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1the actuarially assumed rate from the date of the service to 2the date of payment. 3    (o) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 4conservation police officer, investigator for the Secretary of 5State, Commerce Commission police officer, investigator for 6the Department of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, or 7arson investigator subject to subsection (g) of Section 1-160 8may elect to convert up to 8 years of service credit 9established before January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 10Public Act 101-610) as a conservation police officer, 11investigator for the Secretary of State, Commerce Commission 12police officer, investigator for the Department of Revenue or 13the Illinois Gaming Board, or arson investigator under this 14Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 15election with the Board no later than one year after January 1, 162020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-610), accompanied 17by payment of an amount to be determined by the Board equal to 18(i) the difference between the amount of the employee 19contributions actually paid for that service and the amount of 20the employee contributions that would have been paid had the 21employee contributions been made as a noncovered employee 22serving in a position in which eligible creditable service, as 23defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) interest 24thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 25annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.26    (q) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this   SB1461- 35 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 2establish eligible creditable service for up to 7 years of 3service as a State's Attorney under Article 7 by filing a 4written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an 5amount to be determined by the Board, equal to: (1) the 6difference between the amount of employee and employer 7contributions transferred to the System under Section 7-139.8 8and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 9contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 10policemen; plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 11each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 12the date of payment.13    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 14Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 15establish eligible creditable service for up to 7 years of 16service as a State's Attorney for which credit is not held in 17this System or any other public employee pension fund or 18retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 19file a written application with the Board, accompanied by 20evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board and payment of 21an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee 22contributions for the credit being established, based upon the 23applicant's salary on the first day as an alternative formula 24employee after the employment for which credit is being 25established and the rates then applicable to alternative 26formula employees, plus (2) an amount determined by the Board   SB1461- 36 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1to be the employer's normal cost of the benefits accrued for 2the credit being established, plus (3) regular interest on the 3amounts in items (1) and (2) from the first day as an 4alternative formula employee after the employment for which 5credit is being established to the date of payment. 6(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 8    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-856 and 103-34)9    Sec. 14-110. Alternative retirement annuity. 10    (a) Any member who has withdrawn from service with not 11less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 12attained age 55, and any member who has withdrawn from service 13with not less than 25 years of eligible creditable service and 14has attained age 50, regardless of whether the attainment of 15either of the specified ages occurs while the member is still 16in service, shall be entitled to receive at the option of the 17member, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 18a retirement annuity computed as follows:19        (i) for periods of service as a noncovered employee: 20    if retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001, 3% of 21    final average compensation for each year of creditable 22    service; if retirement occurs before January 1, 2001, 2 23    1/4% of final average compensation for each of the first 24    10 years of creditable service, 2 1/2% for each year above 25    10 years to and including 20 years of creditable service,   SB1461- 37 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    and 2 3/4% for each year of creditable service above 20 2    years; and3        (ii) for periods of eligible creditable service as a 4    covered employee: if retirement occurs on or after January 5    1, 2001, 2.5% of final average compensation for each year 6    of creditable service; if retirement occurs before January 7    1, 2001, 1.67% of final average compensation for each of 8    the first 10 years of such service, 1.90% for each of the 9    next 10 years of such service, 2.10% for each year of such 10    service in excess of 20 but not exceeding 30, and 2.30% for 11    each year in excess of 30.12    Such annuity shall be subject to a maximum of 75% of final 13average compensation if retirement occurs before January 1, 142001 or to a maximum of 80% of final average compensation if 15retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001.16    These rates shall not be applicable to any service 17performed by a member as a covered employee which is not 18eligible creditable service. Service as a covered employee 19which is not eligible creditable service shall be subject to 20the rates and provisions of Section 14-108.21    (b) For the purpose of this Section, "eligible creditable 22service" means creditable service resulting from service in 23one or more of the following positions:24        (1) State policeman;25        (2) fire fighter in the fire protection service of a 26    department;  SB1461- 38 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (3) air pilot;2        (4) special agent;3        (5) investigator for the Secretary of State;4        (6) conservation police officer;5        (7) investigator for the Department of Revenue or the 6    Illinois Gaming Board;7        (8) security employee of the Department of Human 8    Services;9        (9) Central Management Services security police 10    officer;11        (10) security employee of the Department of 12    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;13        (11) dangerous drugs investigator;14        (12) investigator for the Illinois State Police;15        (13) investigator for the Office of the Attorney 16    General;17        (14) controlled substance inspector;18        (15) investigator for the Office of the State's 19    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor;20        (16) Commerce Commission police officer;21        (17) arson investigator;22        (18) State highway maintenance worker;23        (19) security employee of the Department of Innovation 24    and Technology; or 25        (20) transferred employee. 26    A person employed in one of the positions specified in   SB1461- 39 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1this subsection is entitled to eligible creditable service for 2service credit earned under this Article while undergoing the 3basic police training course approved by the Illinois Law 4Enforcement Training Standards Board, if completion of that 5training is required of persons serving in that position. For 6the purposes of this Code, service during the required basic 7police training course shall be deemed performance of the 8duties of the specified position, even though the person is 9not a sworn peace officer at the time of the training.10    A person under paragraph (20) is entitled to eligible 11creditable service for service credit earned under this 12Article on and after his or her transfer by Executive Order No. 132003-10, Executive Order No. 2004-2, or Executive Order No. 142016-1. 15    (c) For the purposes of this Section:16        (1) The term "State policeman" includes any title or 17    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 18    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.19        (2) The term "fire fighter in the fire protection 20    service of a department" includes all officers in such 21    fire protection service including fire chiefs and 22    assistant fire chiefs.23        (3) The term "air pilot" includes any employee whose 24    official job description on file in the Department of 25    Central Management Services, or in the department by which 26    he is employed if that department is not covered by the   SB1461- 40 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    Personnel Code, states that his principal duty is the 2    operation of aircraft, and who possesses a pilot's 3    license; however, the change in this definition made by 4    Public Act 83-842 shall not operate to exclude any 5    noncovered employee who was an "air pilot" for the 6    purposes of this Section on January 1, 1984.7        (4) The term "special agent" means any person who by 8    reason of employment by the Division of Narcotic Control, 9    the Bureau of Investigation or, after July 1, 1977, the 10    Division of Criminal Investigation, the Division of 11    Internal Investigation, the Division of Operations, the 12    Division of Patrol, or any other Division or 13    organizational entity in the Illinois State Police is 14    vested by law with duties to maintain public order, 15    investigate violations of the criminal law of this State, 16    enforce the laws of this State, make arrests and recover 17    property. The term "special agent" includes any title or 18    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 19    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.20        (5) The term "investigator for the Secretary of State" 21    means any person employed by the Office of the Secretary 22    of State and vested with such investigative duties as 23    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 24    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 25    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.26        A person who became employed as an investigator for   SB1461- 41 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    the Secretary of State between January 1, 1967 and 2    December 31, 1975, and who has served as such until 3    attainment of age 60, either continuously or with a single 4    break in service of not more than 3 years duration, which 5    break terminated before January 1, 1976, shall be entitled 6    to have his retirement annuity calculated in accordance 7    with subsection (a), notwithstanding that he has less than 8    20 years of credit for such service.9        (6) The term "Conservation Police Officer" means any 10    person employed by the Division of Law Enforcement of the 11    Department of Natural Resources and vested with such law 12    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 13    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 14    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The 15    term "Conservation Police Officer" includes the positions 16    of Chief Conservation Police Administrator and Assistant 17    Conservation Police Administrator.18        (7) The term "investigator for the Department of 19    Revenue" means any person employed by the Department of 20    Revenue and vested with such investigative duties as 21    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 22    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 23    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.24        The term "investigator for the Illinois Gaming Board" 25    means any person employed as such by the Illinois Gaming 26    Board and vested with such peace officer duties as render   SB1461- 42 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 2    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 3    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. 4        (8) The term "security employee of the Department of 5    Human Services" means any person employed by the 6    Department of Human Services who (i) is employed at the 7    Chester Mental Health Center and has daily contact with 8    the residents thereof, (ii) is employed within a security 9    unit at a facility operated by the Department and has 10    daily contact with the residents of the security unit, 11    (iii) is employed at a facility operated by the Department 12    that includes a security unit and is regularly scheduled 13    to work at least 50% of his or her working hours within 14    that security unit, or (iv) is a mental health police 15    officer. "Mental health police officer" means any person 16    employed by the Department of Human Services in a position 17    pertaining to the Department's mental health and 18    developmental disabilities functions who is vested with 19    such law enforcement duties as render the person 20    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 21    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 22    218(l)(1) of that Act. "Security unit" means that portion 23    of a facility that is devoted to the care, containment, 24    and treatment of persons committed to the Department of 25    Human Services as sexually violent persons, persons unfit 26    to stand trial, or persons not guilty by reason of   SB1461- 43 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    insanity. With respect to past employment, references to 2    the Department of Human Services include its predecessor, 3    the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 4    Disabilities.5        The changes made to this subdivision (c)(8) by Public 6    Act 92-14 apply to persons who retire on or after January 7    1, 2001, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1.8        (9) "Central Management Services security police 9    officer" means any person employed by the Department of 10    Central Management Services who is vested with such law 11    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 12    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 13    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.14        (10) For a member who first became an employee under 15    this Article before July 1, 2005, the term "security 16    employee of the Department of Corrections or the 17    Department of Juvenile Justice" means any employee of the 18    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 19    Justice or the former Department of Personnel, and any 20    member or employee of the Prisoner Review Board, who has 21    daily contact with inmates or youth by working within a 22    correctional facility or Juvenile facility operated by the 23    Department of Juvenile Justice or who is a parole officer 24    or an employee who has direct contact with committed 25    persons in the performance of his or her job duties. For a 26    member who first becomes an employee under this Article on   SB1461- 44 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    or after July 1, 2005, the term means an employee of the 2    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 3    Justice who is any of the following: (i) officially 4    headquartered at a correctional facility or Juvenile 5    facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 6    (ii) a parole officer, (iii) a member of the apprehension 7    unit, (iv) a member of the intelligence unit, (v) a member 8    of the sort team, or (vi) an investigator.9        (11) The term "dangerous drugs investigator" means any 10    person who is employed as such by the Department of Human 11    Services.12        (12) The term "investigator for the Illinois State 13    Police" means a person employed by the Illinois State 14    Police who is vested under Section 4 of the Narcotic 15    Control Division Abolition Act with such law enforcement 16    powers as render him ineligible for coverage under the 17    Social Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 18    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.19        (13) "Investigator for the Office of the Attorney 20    General" means any person who is employed as such by the 21    Office of the Attorney General and is vested with such 22    investigative duties as render him ineligible for coverage 23    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 24    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. For 25    the period before January 1, 1989, the term includes all 26    persons who were employed as investigators by the Office   SB1461- 45 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    of the Attorney General, without regard to social security 2    status.3        (14) "Controlled substance inspector" means any person 4    who is employed as such by the Department of Professional 5    Regulation and is vested with such law enforcement duties 6    as render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 7    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 8    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The term 9    "controlled substance inspector" includes the Program 10    Executive of Enforcement and the Assistant Program 11    Executive of Enforcement.12        (15) The term "investigator for the Office of the 13    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor" means a person 14    employed in that capacity on a full-time basis under the 15    authority of Section 7.06 of the State's Attorneys 16    Appellate Prosecutor's Act.17        (16) "Commerce Commission police officer" means any 18    person employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission who is 19    vested with such law enforcement duties as render him 20    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 21    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 22    218(l)(1) of that Act.23        (17) "Arson investigator" means any person who is 24    employed as such by the Office of the State Fire Marshal 25    and is vested with such law enforcement duties as render 26    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social   SB1461- 46 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 2    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. A person who was 3    employed as an arson investigator on January 1, 1995 and 4    is no longer in service but not yet receiving a retirement 5    annuity may convert his or her creditable service for 6    employment as an arson investigator into eligible 7    creditable service by paying to the System the difference 8    between the employee contributions actually paid for that 9    service and the amounts that would have been contributed 10    if the applicant were contributing at the rate applicable 11    to persons with the same social security status earning 12    eligible creditable service on the date of application.13        (18) The term "State highway maintenance worker" means 14    a person who is either of the following:15            (i) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 16        Illinois Department of Transportation in the position 17        of highway maintainer, highway maintenance lead 18        worker, highway maintenance lead/lead worker, heavy 19        construction equipment operator, power shovel 20        operator, or bridge mechanic; and whose principal 21        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 22        actual maintenance necessary to keep the highways that 23        form a part of the State highway system in serviceable 24        condition for vehicular traffic.25            (ii) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 26        Illinois State Toll Highway Authority in the position   SB1461- 47 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        of equipment operator/laborer H-4, equipment 2        operator/laborer H-6, welder H-4, welder H-6, 3        mechanical/electrical H-4, mechanical/electrical H-6, 4        water/sewer H-4, water/sewer H-6, sign maker/hanger 5        H-4, sign maker/hanger H-6, roadway lighting H-4, 6        roadway lighting H-6, structural H-4, structural H-6, 7        painter H-4, or painter H-6; and whose principal 8        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 9        actual maintenance necessary to keep the Authority's 10        tollways in serviceable condition for vehicular 11        traffic.12        (19) The term "security employee of the Department of 13    Innovation and Technology" means a person who was a 14    security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 15    Department of Juvenile Justice, was transferred to the 16    Department of Innovation and Technology pursuant to 17    Executive Order 2016-01, and continues to perform similar 18    job functions under that Department. 19        (20) "Transferred employee" means an employee who was 20    transferred to the Department of Central Management 21    Services by Executive Order No. 2003-10 or Executive Order 22    No. 2004-2 or transferred to the Department of Innovation 23    and Technology by Executive Order No. 2016-1, or both, and 24    was entitled to eligible creditable service for services 25    immediately preceding the transfer. 26        (21) "State's Attorney" means a person elected or   SB1461- 48 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    appointed to serve as the State's Attorney of a county. 2    "State's Attorney" does not include an assistant State's 3    Attorney or a State's Attorney special investigator. 4    (d) A security employee of the Department of Corrections 5or the Department of Juvenile Justice, a security employee of 6the Department of Human Services who is not a mental health 7police officer, and a security employee of the Department of 8Innovation and Technology shall not be eligible for the 9alternative retirement annuity provided by this Section unless 10he or she meets the following minimum age and service 11requirements at the time of retirement:12        (i) 25 years of eligible creditable service and age 13    55; or14        (ii) beginning January 1, 1987, 25 years of eligible 15    creditable service and age 54, or 24 years of eligible 16    creditable service and age 55; or17        (iii) beginning January 1, 1988, 25 years of eligible 18    creditable service and age 53, or 23 years of eligible 19    creditable service and age 55; or20        (iv) beginning January 1, 1989, 25 years of eligible 21    creditable service and age 52, or 22 years of eligible 22    creditable service and age 55; or23        (v) beginning January 1, 1990, 25 years of eligible 24    creditable service and age 51, or 21 years of eligible 25    creditable service and age 55; or26        (vi) beginning January 1, 1991, 25 years of eligible   SB1461- 49 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    creditable service and age 50, or 20 years of eligible 2    creditable service and age 55.3    Persons who have service credit under Article 16 of this 4Code for service as a security employee of the Department of 5Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 6Department of Human Services in a position requiring 7certification as a teacher may count such service toward 8establishing their eligibility under the service requirements 9of this Section; but such service may be used only for 10establishing such eligibility, and not for the purpose of 11increasing or calculating any benefit.12    (e) If a member enters military service while working in a 13position in which eligible creditable service may be earned, 14and returns to State service in the same or another such 15position, and fulfills in all other respects the conditions 16prescribed in this Article for credit for military service, 17such military service shall be credited as eligible creditable 18service for the purposes of the retirement annuity prescribed 19in this Section.20    (f) For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 21this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 221968 and before October 1, 1975 as a covered employee in the 23position of special agent, conservation police officer, mental 24health police officer, or investigator for the Secretary of 25State, shall be deemed to have been service as a noncovered 26employee, provided that the employee pays to the System prior   SB1461- 50 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1to retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between 2the employee contributions that would have been required for 3such service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of 4employee contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is 5made after July 31, 1987, regular interest on the amount 6specified in item (1) from the date of service to the date of 7payment.8    For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 9this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 101968 and before January 1, 1982 as a covered employee in the 11position of investigator for the Department of Revenue shall 12be deemed to have been service as a noncovered employee, 13provided that the employee pays to the System prior to 14retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between the 15employee contributions that would have been required for such 16service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of employee 17contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is made after 18January 1, 1990, regular interest on the amount specified in 19item (1) from the date of service to the date of payment.20    (g) A State policeman may elect, not later than January 1, 211990, to establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 22years of his service as a policeman under Article 3, by filing 23a written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of 24an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (i) the 25difference between the amount of employee and employer 26contributions transferred to the System under Section 3-110.5,   SB1461- 51 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 2contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 3policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 4for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 5to the date of payment.6    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 7policeman may elect, not later than July 1, 1993, to establish 8eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of his service 9as a member of the County Police Department under Article 9, by 10filing a written election with the Board, accompanied by 11payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to 12(i) the difference between the amount of employee and employer 13contributions transferred to the System under Section 9-121.10 14and the amounts that would have been contributed had those 15contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 16policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 17for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 18to the date of payment.19    (h) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 20policeman or investigator for the Secretary of State may elect 21to establish eligible creditable service for up to 12 years of 22his service as a policeman under Article 5, by filing a written 23election with the Board on or before January 31, 1992, and 24paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 25determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 26the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred   SB1461- 52 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1to the System under Section 5-236, and the amounts that would 2have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 3rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 4thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 5annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.6    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 7policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 8the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 9creditable service for up to 10 years of service as a sheriff's 10law enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 11election with the Board on or before January 31, 1993, and 12paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 13determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 14the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 15to the System under Section 7-139.7, and the amounts that 16would have been contributed had such contributions been made 17at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 18thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 19annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.20    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 21policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 22the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 23creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a police 24officer under Article 3, a policeman under Article 5, a 25sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7, a member 26of the county police department under Article 9, or a police   SB1461- 53 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1officer under Article 15 by filing a written election with the 2Board and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 3the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 4employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 5under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, 9-121.10, or 15-134.4 6and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 7contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 8policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 9for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 10to the date of payment.11    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 12investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, or an 13investigator for the Department of Revenue, may elect to 14establish eligible creditable service for up to 5 years of 15service as a police officer under Article 3, a policeman under 16Article 5, a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 177, or a member of the county police department under Article 9 18by filing a written election with the Board within 6 months 19after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 2096-745) and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 21the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 22employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 23under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, or 9-121.10 and the 24amounts that would have been contributed had such 25contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 26policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially   SB1461- 54 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 2of service to the date of payment.3    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 4policeman, conservation police officer, investigator for the 5Office of the Attorney General, an investigator for the 6Department of Revenue, or investigator for the Secretary of 7State may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 8up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 9participating municipality to perform police duties, or law 10enforcement officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest 11preserve district under Article 7, a county corrections 12officer, or a court services officer under Article 9, by 13filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 14August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-745) and 15paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board, 16equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 17employer contributions transferred to the System under 18Sections 7-139.8 and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have 19been contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 20applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at 21the actuarially assumed rate for each year, compounded 22annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.23    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 24policeman, arson investigator, or Commerce Commission police 25officer may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 26up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a   SB1461- 55 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1participating municipality to perform police duties under 2Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court services 3officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under Article 4 by 4filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 5July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 6paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 7equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 8employer contributions transferred to the System under 9Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 and the amounts that 10would have been contributed had such contributions been made 11at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 12thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for each year, 13compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 14payment. 15    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 16conservation police officer may elect to establish eligible 17creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person 18employed by a participating municipality to perform police 19duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, or a 20court services officer under Article 9 by filing a written 21election with the Board within 6 months after July 30, 2021 22(the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to the 23System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) the 24difference between the amount of employee and employer 25contributions transferred to the System under Sections 7-139.8 26and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have been contributed   SB1461- 56 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1had such contributions been made at the rates applicable to 2State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 3assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 4of service to the date of payment. 5    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 6investigator for the Department of Revenue, investigator for 7the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the Secretary of 8State, or arson investigator may elect to establish eligible 9creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person 10employed by a participating municipality to perform police 11duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court 12services officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under 13Article 4 by filing a written election with the Board within 6 14months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 15102nd General Assembly and paying to the System an amount to be 16determined by the Board equal to (i) the difference between 17the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 18to the System under Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 19and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 20contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 21policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 22assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 23of service to the date of payment. 24    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), a State 25policeman or conservation police officer may elect to convert 26service credit earned under this Article to eligible   SB1461- 57 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1creditable service, as defined by this Section, by filing a 2written election with the Board board within 6 months after 3July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 4paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 5equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee 6contributions originally paid for that service and the amounts 7that would have been contributed had such contributions been 8made at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) the 9difference between the employer's normal cost of the credit 10prior to the conversion authorized by the amendatory Act of 11the 104th General Assembly Public Act 102-210 and the 12employer's normal cost of the credit converted in accordance 13with this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly Public 14Act 102-210, plus (iii) interest thereon at the actuarially 15assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 16of service to the date of payment. 17    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), an 18investigator for the Department of Revenue, investigator for 19the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the Secretary of 20State, or arson investigator may elect to convert service 21credit earned under this Article to eligible creditable 22service, as defined by this Section, by filing a written 23election with the Board within 6 months after the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and 25paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 26equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee   SB1461- 58 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1contributions originally paid for that service and the amounts 2that would have been contributed had such contributions been 3made at the rates applicable to investigators for the 4Department of Revenue, investigators for the Illinois Gaming 5Board, investigators for the Secretary of State, or arson 6investigators, plus (ii) the difference between the employer's 7normal cost of the credit prior to the conversion authorized 8by this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and the 9employer's normal cost of the credit converted in accordance 10with this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, plus 11(iii) interest thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for 12each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 13the date of payment. 14    (i) The total amount of eligible creditable service 15established by any person under subsections (g), (h), (j), 16(k), (l), (l-5), and (o), and (q) of this Section shall not 17exceed 12 years.18    (j) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 19investigator for the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 20Prosecutor or a controlled substance inspector may elect to 21establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of 22his service as a policeman under Article 3 or a sheriff's law 23enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 24election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an amount 25to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) the difference 26between the amount of employee and employer contributions   SB1461- 59 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1transferred to the System under Section 3-110.6 or 7-139.8, 2and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 3contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 4policemen, plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 5each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 6the date of payment.7    (k) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 8Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 9establish eligible creditable service for periods spent as a 10full-time law enforcement officer or full-time corrections 11officer employed by the federal government or by a state or 12local government located outside of Illinois, for which credit 13is not held in any other public employee pension fund or 14retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 15file a written application with the Board by March 31, 1998, 16accompanied by evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board 17and payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal 18to (1) employee contributions for the credit being 19established, based upon the applicant's salary on the first 20day as an alternative formula employee after the employment 21for which credit is being established and the rates then 22applicable to alternative formula employees, plus (2) an 23amount determined by the Board to be the employer's normal 24cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being established, 25plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items (1) and (2) 26from the first day as an alternative formula employee after   SB1461- 60 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1the employment for which credit is being established to the 2date of payment.3    (l) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 4security employee of the Department of Corrections may elect, 5not later than July 1, 1998, to establish eligible creditable 6service for up to 10 years of his or her service as a policeman 7under Article 3, by filing a written election with the Board, 8accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined by the 9Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 10employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 11under Section 3-110.5, and the amounts that would have been 12contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 13applicable to security employees of the Department of 14Corrections, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 15for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 16to the date of payment.17    (l-5) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 18Section, a State policeman may elect to establish eligible 19creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a full-time 20law enforcement officer employed by the federal government or 21by a state or local government located outside of Illinois for 22which credit is not held in any other public employee pension 23fund or retirement system. To obtain this credit, the 24applicant must file a written application with the Board no 25later than 3 years after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 26Public Act 101-610), accompanied by evidence of eligibility   SB1461- 61 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1acceptable to the Board and payment of an amount to be 2determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee contributions 3for the credit being established, based upon the applicant's 4salary on the first day as an alternative formula employee 5after the employment for which credit is being established and 6the rates then applicable to alternative formula employees, 7plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be the employer's 8normal cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being 9established, plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items 10(1) and (2) from the first day as an alternative formula 11employee after the employment for which credit is being 12established to the date of payment. 13    (m) The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public 14Act 94-696 apply only to: (1) security employees of the 15Department of Juvenile Justice employed by the Department of 16Corrections before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public 17Act 94-696) and transferred to the Department of Juvenile 18Justice by Public Act 94-696; and (2) persons employed by the 19Department of Juvenile Justice on or after June 1, 2006 (the 20effective date of Public Act 94-696) who are required by 21subsection (b) of Section 3-2.5-15 of the Unified Code of 22Corrections to have any bachelor's or advanced degree from an 23accredited college or university or, in the case of persons 24who provide vocational training, who are required to have 25adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 26the vocational training.   SB1461- 62 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    (n) A person employed in a position under subsection (b) 2of this Section who has purchased service credit under 3subsection (j) of Section 14-104 or subsection (b) of Section 414-105 in any other capacity under this Article may convert up 5to 5 years of that service credit into service credit covered 6under this Section by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) 7the additional employee contribution required under Section 814-133, plus (2) the additional employer contribution required 9under Section 14-131, plus (3) interest on items (1) and (2) at 10the actuarially assumed rate from the date of the service to 11the date of payment. 12    (o) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 13conservation police officer, investigator for the Secretary of 14State, Commerce Commission police officer, investigator for 15the Department of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, or 16arson investigator subject to subsection (g) of Section 1-160 17may elect to convert up to 8 years of service credit 18established before January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 19Public Act 101-610) as a conservation police officer, 20investigator for the Secretary of State, Commerce Commission 21police officer, investigator for the Department of Revenue or 22the Illinois Gaming Board, or arson investigator under this 23Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 24election with the Board no later than one year after January 1, 252020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-610), accompanied 26by payment of an amount to be determined by the Board equal to   SB1461- 63 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1(i) the difference between the amount of the employee 2contributions actually paid for that service and the amount of 3the employee contributions that would have been paid had the 4employee contributions been made as a noncovered employee 5serving in a position in which eligible creditable service, as 6defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) interest 7thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 8annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.9    (q) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 10Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 11establish eligible creditable service for up to 7 years of 12service as a State's Attorney under Article 7 by filing a 13written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an 14amount to be determined by the Board, equal to: (1) the 15difference between the amount of employee and employer 16contributions transferred to the System under Section 7-139.8 17and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 18contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 19policemen; plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 20each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 21the date of payment.22    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 23Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 24establish eligible creditable service for up to 7 years of 25service as a State's Attorney for which credit is not held in 26this System or any other public employee pension fund or   SB1461- 64 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 2file a written application with the Board, accompanied by 3evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board and payment of 4an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee 5contributions for the credit being established, based upon the 6applicant's salary on the first day as an alternative formula 7employee after the employment for which credit is being 8established and the rates then applicable to alternative 9formula employees, plus (2) an amount determined by the Board 10to be the employer's normal cost of the benefits accrued for 11the credit being established, plus (3) regular interest on the 12amounts in items (1) and (2) from the first day as an 13alternative formula employee after the employment for which 14credit is being established to the date of payment. 15(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-856, eff. 1-1-23; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 17    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-956 and 103-34)18    Sec. 14-110. Alternative retirement annuity. 19    (a) Any member who has withdrawn from service with not 20less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 21attained age 55, and any member who has withdrawn from service 22with not less than 25 years of eligible creditable service and 23has attained age 50, regardless of whether the attainment of 24either of the specified ages occurs while the member is still 25in service, shall be entitled to receive at the option of the   SB1461- 65 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1member, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 2a retirement annuity computed as follows:3        (i) for periods of service as a noncovered employee: 4    if retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001, 3% of 5    final average compensation for each year of creditable 6    service; if retirement occurs before January 1, 2001, 2 7    1/4% of final average compensation for each of the first 8    10 years of creditable service, 2 1/2% for each year above 9    10 years to and including 20 years of creditable service, 10    and 2 3/4% for each year of creditable service above 20 11    years; and12        (ii) for periods of eligible creditable service as a 13    covered employee: if retirement occurs on or after January 14    1, 2001, 2.5% of final average compensation for each year 15    of creditable service; if retirement occurs before January 16    1, 2001, 1.67% of final average compensation for each of 17    the first 10 years of such service, 1.90% for each of the 18    next 10 years of such service, 2.10% for each year of such 19    service in excess of 20 but not exceeding 30, and 2.30% for 20    each year in excess of 30.21    Such annuity shall be subject to a maximum of 75% of final 22average compensation if retirement occurs before January 1, 232001 or to a maximum of 80% of final average compensation if 24retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001.25    These rates shall not be applicable to any service 26performed by a member as a covered employee which is not   SB1461- 66 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1eligible creditable service. Service as a covered employee 2which is not eligible creditable service shall be subject to 3the rates and provisions of Section 14-108.4    (b) For the purpose of this Section, "eligible creditable 5service" means creditable service resulting from service in 6one or more of the following positions:7        (1) State policeman;8        (2) fire fighter in the fire protection service of a 9    department;10        (3) air pilot;11        (4) special agent;12        (5) investigator for the Secretary of State;13        (6) conservation police officer;14        (7) investigator for the Department of Revenue or the 15    Illinois Gaming Board;16        (8) security employee of the Department of Human 17    Services;18        (9) Central Management Services security police 19    officer;20        (10) security employee of the Department of 21    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;22        (11) dangerous drugs investigator;23        (12) investigator for the Illinois State Police;24        (13) investigator for the Office of the Attorney 25    General;26        (14) controlled substance inspector;  SB1461- 67 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (15) investigator for the Office of the State's 2    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor;3        (16) Commerce Commission police officer;4        (17) arson investigator;5        (18) State highway maintenance worker;6        (19) security employee of the Department of Innovation 7    and Technology; or 8        (20) transferred employee. 9    A person employed in one of the positions specified in 10this subsection is entitled to eligible creditable service for 11service credit earned under this Article while undergoing the 12basic police training course approved by the Illinois Law 13Enforcement Training Standards Board, if completion of that 14training is required of persons serving in that position. For 15the purposes of this Code, service during the required basic 16police training course shall be deemed performance of the 17duties of the specified position, even though the person is 18not a sworn peace officer at the time of the training.19    A person under paragraph (20) is entitled to eligible 20creditable service for service credit earned under this 21Article on and after his or her transfer by Executive Order No. 222003-10, Executive Order No. 2004-2, or Executive Order No. 232016-1. 24    (c) For the purposes of this Section:25        (1) The term "State policeman" includes any title or 26    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an   SB1461- 68 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.2        (2) The term "fire fighter in the fire protection 3    service of a department" includes all officers in such 4    fire protection service including fire chiefs and 5    assistant fire chiefs.6        (3) The term "air pilot" includes any employee whose 7    official job description on file in the Department of 8    Central Management Services, or in the department by which 9    he is employed if that department is not covered by the 10    Personnel Code, states that his principal duty is the 11    operation of aircraft, and who possesses a pilot's 12    license; however, the change in this definition made by 13    Public Act 83-842 shall not operate to exclude any 14    noncovered employee who was an "air pilot" for the 15    purposes of this Section on January 1, 1984.16        (4) The term "special agent" means any person who by 17    reason of employment by the Division of Narcotic Control, 18    the Bureau of Investigation or, after July 1, 1977, the 19    Division of Criminal Investigation, the Division of 20    Internal Investigation, the Division of Operations, the 21    Division of Patrol, or any other Division or 22    organizational entity in the Illinois State Police is 23    vested by law with duties to maintain public order, 24    investigate violations of the criminal law of this State, 25    enforce the laws of this State, make arrests and recover 26    property. The term "special agent" includes any title or   SB1461- 69 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 2    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.3        (5) The term "investigator for the Secretary of State" 4    means any person employed by the Office of the Secretary 5    of State and vested with such investigative duties as 6    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 7    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 8    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.9        A person who became employed as an investigator for 10    the Secretary of State between January 1, 1967 and 11    December 31, 1975, and who has served as such until 12    attainment of age 60, either continuously or with a single 13    break in service of not more than 3 years duration, which 14    break terminated before January 1, 1976, shall be entitled 15    to have his retirement annuity calculated in accordance 16    with subsection (a), notwithstanding that he has less than 17    20 years of credit for such service.18        (6) The term "Conservation Police Officer" means any 19    person employed by the Division of Law Enforcement of the 20    Department of Natural Resources and vested with such law 21    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 22    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 23    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The 24    term "Conservation Police Officer" includes the positions 25    of Chief Conservation Police Administrator and Assistant 26    Conservation Police Administrator.  SB1461- 70 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        (7) The term "investigator for the Department of 2    Revenue" means any person employed by the Department of 3    Revenue and vested with such investigative duties as 4    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 5    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 6    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.7        The term "investigator for the Illinois Gaming Board" 8    means any person employed as such by the Illinois Gaming 9    Board and vested with such peace officer duties as render 10    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 11    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 12    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. 13        (8) The term "security employee of the Department of 14    Human Services" means any person employed by the 15    Department of Human Services who (i) is employed at the 16    Chester Mental Health Center and has daily contact with 17    the residents thereof, (ii) is employed within a security 18    unit at a facility operated by the Department and has 19    daily contact with the residents of the security unit, 20    (iii) is employed at a facility operated by the Department 21    that includes a security unit and is regularly scheduled 22    to work at least 50% of his or her working hours within 23    that security unit, or (iv) is a mental health police 24    officer. "Mental health police officer" means any person 25    employed by the Department of Human Services in a position 26    pertaining to the Department's mental health and   SB1461- 71 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    developmental disabilities functions who is vested with 2    such law enforcement duties as render the person 3    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 4    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 5    218(l)(1) of that Act. "Security unit" means that portion 6    of a facility that is devoted to the care, containment, 7    and treatment of persons committed to the Department of 8    Human Services as sexually violent persons, persons unfit 9    to stand trial, or persons not guilty by reason of 10    insanity. With respect to past employment, references to 11    the Department of Human Services include its predecessor, 12    the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 13    Disabilities.14        The changes made to this subdivision (c)(8) by Public 15    Act 92-14 apply to persons who retire on or after January 16    1, 2001, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1.17        (9) "Central Management Services security police 18    officer" means any person employed by the Department of 19    Central Management Services who is vested with such law 20    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 21    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 22    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.23        (10) For a member who first became an employee under 24    this Article before July 1, 2005, the term "security 25    employee of the Department of Corrections or the 26    Department of Juvenile Justice" means any employee of the   SB1461- 72 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 2    Justice or the former Department of Personnel, and any 3    member or employee of the Prisoner Review Board, who has 4    daily contact with inmates or youth by working within a 5    correctional facility or Juvenile facility operated by the 6    Department of Juvenile Justice or who is a parole officer 7    or an employee who has direct contact with committed 8    persons in the performance of his or her job duties. For a 9    member who first becomes an employee under this Article on 10    or after July 1, 2005, the term means an employee of the 11    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 12    Justice who is any of the following: (i) officially 13    headquartered at a correctional facility or Juvenile 14    facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 15    (ii) a parole officer, (iii) a member of the apprehension 16    unit, (iv) a member of the intelligence unit, (v) a member 17    of the sort team, or (vi) an investigator.18        (11) The term "dangerous drugs investigator" means any 19    person who is employed as such by the Department of Human 20    Services.21        (12) The term "investigator for the Illinois State 22    Police" means a person employed by the Illinois State 23    Police who is vested under Section 4 of the Narcotic 24    Control Division Abolition Act with such law enforcement 25    powers as render him ineligible for coverage under the 26    Social Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A),   SB1461- 73 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.2        (13) "Investigator for the Office of the Attorney 3    General" means any person who is employed as such by the 4    Office of the Attorney General and is vested with such 5    investigative duties as render him ineligible for coverage 6    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 7    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. For 8    the period before January 1, 1989, the term includes all 9    persons who were employed as investigators by the Office 10    of the Attorney General, without regard to social security 11    status.12        (14) "Controlled substance inspector" means any person 13    who is employed as such by the Department of Professional 14    Regulation and is vested with such law enforcement duties 15    as render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 16    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 17    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The term 18    "controlled substance inspector" includes the Program 19    Executive of Enforcement and the Assistant Program 20    Executive of Enforcement.21        (15) The term "investigator for the Office of the 22    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor" means a person 23    employed in that capacity on a full-time basis under the 24    authority of Section 7.06 of the State's Attorneys 25    Appellate Prosecutor's Act.26        (16) "Commerce Commission police officer" means any   SB1461- 74 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    person employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission who is 2    vested with such law enforcement duties as render him 3    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 4    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 5    218(l)(1) of that Act.6        (17) "Arson investigator" means any person who is 7    employed as such by the Office of the State Fire Marshal 8    and is vested with such law enforcement duties as render 9    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 10    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 11    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. A person who was 12    employed as an arson investigator on January 1, 1995 and 13    is no longer in service but not yet receiving a retirement 14    annuity may convert his or her creditable service for 15    employment as an arson investigator into eligible 16    creditable service by paying to the System the difference 17    between the employee contributions actually paid for that 18    service and the amounts that would have been contributed 19    if the applicant were contributing at the rate applicable 20    to persons with the same social security status earning 21    eligible creditable service on the date of application.22        (18) The term "State highway maintenance worker" means 23    a person who is either of the following:24            (i) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 25        Illinois Department of Transportation in the position 26        of highway maintainer, highway maintenance lead   SB1461- 75 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1        worker, highway maintenance lead/lead worker, heavy 2        construction equipment operator, power shovel 3        operator, or bridge mechanic; and whose principal 4        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 5        actual maintenance necessary to keep the highways that 6        form a part of the State highway system in serviceable 7        condition for vehicular traffic.8            (ii) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 9        Illinois State Toll Highway Authority in the position 10        of equipment operator/laborer H-4, equipment 11        operator/laborer H-6, welder H-4, welder H-6, 12        mechanical/electrical H-4, mechanical/electrical H-6, 13        water/sewer H-4, water/sewer H-6, sign maker/hanger 14        H-4, sign maker/hanger H-6, roadway lighting H-4, 15        roadway lighting H-6, structural H-4, structural H-6, 16        painter H-4, or painter H-6; and whose principal 17        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 18        actual maintenance necessary to keep the Authority's 19        tollways in serviceable condition for vehicular 20        traffic.21        (19) The term "security employee of the Department of 22    Innovation and Technology" means a person who was a 23    security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 24    Department of Juvenile Justice, was transferred to the 25    Department of Innovation and Technology pursuant to 26    Executive Order 2016-01, and continues to perform similar   SB1461- 76 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    job functions under that Department. 2        (20) "Transferred employee" means an employee who was 3    transferred to the Department of Central Management 4    Services by Executive Order No. 2003-10 or Executive Order 5    No. 2004-2 or transferred to the Department of Innovation 6    and Technology by Executive Order No. 2016-1, or both, and 7    was entitled to eligible creditable service for services 8    immediately preceding the transfer. 9        (21) "State's Attorney" means a person elected or 10    appointed to serve as the State's Attorney of a county. 11    "State's Attorney" does not include an assistant State's 12    Attorney or a State's Attorney special investigator. 13    (d) A security employee of the Department of Corrections 14or the Department of Juvenile Justice, a security employee of 15the Department of Human Services who is not a mental health 16police officer, and a security employee of the Department of 17Innovation and Technology shall not be eligible for the 18alternative retirement annuity provided by this Section unless 19he or she meets the following minimum age and service 20requirements at the time of retirement:21        (i) 25 years of eligible creditable service and age 22    55; or23        (ii) beginning January 1, 1987, 25 years of eligible 24    creditable service and age 54, or 24 years of eligible 25    creditable service and age 55; or26        (iii) beginning January 1, 1988, 25 years of eligible   SB1461- 77 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1    creditable service and age 53, or 23 years of eligible 2    creditable service and age 55; or3        (iv) beginning January 1, 1989, 25 years of eligible 4    creditable service and age 52, or 22 years of eligible 5    creditable service and age 55; or6        (v) beginning January 1, 1990, 25 years of eligible 7    creditable service and age 51, or 21 years of eligible 8    creditable service and age 55; or9        (vi) beginning January 1, 1991, 25 years of eligible 10    creditable service and age 50, or 20 years of eligible 11    creditable service and age 55.12    Persons who have service credit under Article 16 of this 13Code for service as a security employee of the Department of 14Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 15Department of Human Services in a position requiring 16certification as a teacher may count such service toward 17establishing their eligibility under the service requirements 18of this Section; but such service may be used only for 19establishing such eligibility, and not for the purpose of 20increasing or calculating any benefit.21    (e) If a member enters military service while working in a 22position in which eligible creditable service may be earned, 23and returns to State service in the same or another such 24position, and fulfills in all other respects the conditions 25prescribed in this Article for credit for military service, 26such military service shall be credited as eligible creditable   SB1461- 78 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1service for the purposes of the retirement annuity prescribed 2in this Section.3    (f) For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 4this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 51968 and before October 1, 1975 as a covered employee in the 6position of special agent, conservation police officer, mental 7health police officer, or investigator for the Secretary of 8State, shall be deemed to have been service as a noncovered 9employee, provided that the employee pays to the System prior 10to retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between 11the employee contributions that would have been required for 12such service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of 13employee contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is 14made after July 31, 1987, regular interest on the amount 15specified in item (1) from the date of service to the date of 16payment.17    For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 18this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 191968 and before January 1, 1982 as a covered employee in the 20position of investigator for the Department of Revenue shall 21be deemed to have been service as a noncovered employee, 22provided that the employee pays to the System prior to 23retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between the 24employee contributions that would have been required for such 25service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of employee 26contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is made after   SB1461- 79 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1January 1, 1990, regular interest on the amount specified in 2item (1) from the date of service to the date of payment.3    (g) A State policeman may elect, not later than January 1, 41990, to establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 5years of his service as a policeman under Article 3, by filing 6a written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of 7an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (i) the 8difference between the amount of employee and employer 9contributions transferred to the System under Section 3-110.5, 10and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 11contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 12policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 13for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 14to the date of payment.15    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 16policeman may elect, not later than July 1, 1993, to establish 17eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of his service 18as a member of the County Police Department under Article 9, by 19filing a written election with the Board, accompanied by 20payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to 21(i) the difference between the amount of employee and employer 22contributions transferred to the System under Section 9-121.10 23and the amounts that would have been contributed had those 24contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 25policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 26for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service   SB1461- 80 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1to the date of payment.2    (h) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 3policeman or investigator for the Secretary of State may elect 4to establish eligible creditable service for up to 12 years of 5his service as a policeman under Article 5, by filing a written 6election with the Board on or before January 31, 1992, and 7paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 8determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 9the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 10to the System under Section 5-236, and the amounts that would 11have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 12rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 13thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 14annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.15    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 16policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 17the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 18creditable service for up to 10 years of service as a sheriff's 19law enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 20election with the Board on or before January 31, 1993, and 21paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 22determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 23the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 24to the System under Section 7-139.7, and the amounts that 25would have been contributed had such contributions been made 26at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest   SB1461- 81 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 2annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.3    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 4policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 5the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 6creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a police 7officer under Article 3, a policeman under Article 5, a 8sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7, a member 9of the county police department under Article 9, or a police 10officer under Article 15 by filing a written election with the 11Board and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 12the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 13employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 14under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, 9-121.10, or 15-134.4 15and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 16contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 17policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 18for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 19to the date of payment.20    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 21investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, or an 22investigator for the Department of Revenue, may elect to 23establish eligible creditable service for up to 5 years of 24service as a police officer under Article 3, a policeman under 25Article 5, a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 267, or a member of the county police department under Article 9   SB1461- 82 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1by filing a written election with the Board within 6 months 2after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 396-745) and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 4the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 5employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 6under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, or 9-121.10 and the 7amounts that would have been contributed had such 8contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 9policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 10assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 11of service to the date of payment.12    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 13policeman, conservation police officer, investigator for the 14Office of the Attorney General, an investigator for the 15Department of Revenue, or investigator for the Secretary of 16State may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 17up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 18participating municipality to perform police duties, or law 19enforcement officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest 20preserve district under Article 7, a county corrections 21officer, or a court services officer under Article 9, by 22filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 23August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-745) and 24paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board, 25equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 26employer contributions transferred to the System under   SB1461- 83 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1Sections 7-139.8 and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have 2been contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 3applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at 4the actuarially assumed rate for each year, compounded 5annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.6    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 7policeman, arson investigator, or Commerce Commission police 8officer may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 9up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 10participating municipality to perform police duties under 11Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court services 12officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under Article 4 by 13filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 14July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 15paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 16equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 17employer contributions transferred to the System under 18Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 and the amounts that 19would have been contributed had such contributions been made 20at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 21thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for each year, 22compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 23payment. 24    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 25conservation police officer may elect to establish eligible 26creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person   SB1461- 84 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1employed by a participating municipality to perform police 2duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, or a 3court services officer under Article 9 by filing a written 4election with the Board within 6 months after July 30, 2021 5(the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to the 6System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) the 7difference between the amount of employee and employer 8contributions transferred to the System under Sections 7-139.8 9and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have been contributed 10had such contributions been made at the rates applicable to 11State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 12assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 13of service to the date of payment. 14    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), a State 15policeman or conservation police officer may elect to convert 16service credit earned under this Article to eligible 17creditable service, as defined by this Section, by filing a 18written election with the Board board within 6 months after 19July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 20paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 21equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee 22contributions originally paid for that service and the amounts 23that would have been contributed had such contributions been 24made at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) the 25difference between the employer's normal cost of the credit 26prior to the conversion authorized by the amendatory Act of   SB1461- 85 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1the 104th General Assembly Public Act 102-210 and the 2employer's normal cost of the credit converted in accordance 3with this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly Public 4Act 102-210, plus (iii) interest thereon at the actuarially 5assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 6of service to the date of payment. 7    (i) The total amount of eligible creditable service 8established by any person under subsections (g), (h), (j), 9(k), (l), (l-5), (o), and (p), and (q) of this Section shall 10not exceed 12 years.11    (j) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 12investigator for the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 13Prosecutor or a controlled substance inspector may elect to 14establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of 15his service as a policeman under Article 3 or a sheriff's law 16enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 17election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an amount 18to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) the difference 19between the amount of employee and employer contributions 20transferred to the System under Section 3-110.6 or 7-139.8, 21and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 22contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 23policemen, plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 24each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 25the date of payment.26    (k) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this   SB1461- 86 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 2establish eligible creditable service for periods spent as a 3full-time law enforcement officer or full-time corrections 4officer employed by the federal government or by a state or 5local government located outside of Illinois, for which credit 6is not held in any other public employee pension fund or 7retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 8file a written application with the Board by March 31, 1998, 9accompanied by evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board 10and payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal 11to (1) employee contributions for the credit being 12established, based upon the applicant's salary on the first 13day as an alternative formula employee after the employment 14for which credit is being established and the rates then 15applicable to alternative formula employees, plus (2) an 16amount determined by the Board to be the employer's normal 17cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being established, 18plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items (1) and (2) 19from the first day as an alternative formula employee after 20the employment for which credit is being established to the 21date of payment.22    (l) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 23security employee of the Department of Corrections may elect, 24not later than July 1, 1998, to establish eligible creditable 25service for up to 10 years of his or her service as a policeman 26under Article 3, by filing a written election with the Board,   SB1461- 87 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined by the 2Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 3employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 4under Section 3-110.5, and the amounts that would have been 5contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 6applicable to security employees of the Department of 7Corrections, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 8for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 9to the date of payment.10    (l-5) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 11Section, a State policeman may elect to establish eligible 12creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a full-time 13law enforcement officer employed by the federal government or 14by a state or local government located outside of Illinois for 15which credit is not held in any other public employee pension 16fund or retirement system. To obtain this credit, the 17applicant must file a written application with the Board no 18later than 3 years after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 19Public Act 101-610), accompanied by evidence of eligibility 20acceptable to the Board and payment of an amount to be 21determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee contributions 22for the credit being established, based upon the applicant's 23salary on the first day as an alternative formula employee 24after the employment for which credit is being established and 25the rates then applicable to alternative formula employees, 26plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be the employer's   SB1461- 88 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1normal cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being 2established, plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items 3(1) and (2) from the first day as an alternative formula 4employee after the employment for which credit is being 5established to the date of payment. 6    (m) The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public 7Act 94-696 apply only to: (1) security employees of the 8Department of Juvenile Justice employed by the Department of 9Corrections before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public 10Act 94-696) and transferred to the Department of Juvenile 11Justice by Public Act 94-696; and (2) persons employed by the 12Department of Juvenile Justice on or after June 1, 2006 (the 13effective date of Public Act 94-696) who are required by 14subsection (b) of Section 3-2.5-15 of the Unified Code of 15Corrections to have any bachelor's or advanced degree from an 16accredited college or university or, in the case of persons 17who provide vocational training, who are required to have 18adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 19the vocational training. 20    (n) A person employed in a position under subsection (b) 21of this Section who has purchased service credit under 22subsection (j) of Section 14-104 or subsection (b) of Section 2314-105 in any other capacity under this Article may convert up 24to 5 years of that service credit into service credit covered 25under this Section by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) 26the additional employee contribution required under Section   SB1461- 89 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b114-133, plus (2) the additional employer contribution required 2under Section 14-131, plus (3) interest on items (1) and (2) at 3the actuarially assumed rate from the date of the service to 4the date of payment. 5    (o) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 6conservation police officer, investigator for the Secretary of 7State, Commerce Commission police officer, investigator for 8the Department of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, or 9arson investigator subject to subsection (g) of Section 1-160 10may elect to convert up to 8 years of service credit 11established before January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 12Public Act 101-610) as a conservation police officer, 13investigator for the Secretary of State, Commerce Commission 14police officer, investigator for the Department of Revenue or 15the Illinois Gaming Board, or arson investigator under this 16Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 17election with the Board no later than one year after January 1, 182020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-610), accompanied 19by payment of an amount to be determined by the Board equal to 20(i) the difference between the amount of the employee 21contributions actually paid for that service and the amount of 22the employee contributions that would have been paid had the 23employee contributions been made as a noncovered employee 24serving in a position in which eligible creditable service, as 25defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) interest 26thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded   SB1461- 90 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.2    (p) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 3investigator for the Office of the Attorney General subject to 4subsection (g) of Section 1-160 may elect to convert up to 8 5years of service credit established before the effective date 6of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly as an 7investigator for the Office of the Attorney General under this 8Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 9election with the Board no later than one year after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 11Assembly, accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined 12by the Board equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 13the employee contributions actually paid for that service and 14the amount of the employee contributions that would have been 15paid had the employee contributions been made as a noncovered 16employee serving in a position in which eligible creditable 17service, as defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) 18interest thereon at the effective rate for each year, 19compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 20payment. 21    (q) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 22Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 23establish eligible creditable service for up to 7 years of 24service as a State's Attorney under Article 7 by filing a 25written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an 26amount to be determined by the Board, equal to: (1) the   SB1461- 91 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1difference between the amount of employee and employer 2contributions transferred to the System under Section 7-139.8 3and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 4contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 5policemen; plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 6each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 7the date of payment.8    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 9Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 10establish eligible creditable service for up to 7 years of 11service as a State's Attorney for which credit is not held in 12this System or any other public employee pension fund or 13retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 14file a written application with the Board, accompanied by 15evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board and payment of 16an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee 17contributions for the credit being established, based upon the 18applicant's salary on the first day as an alternative formula 19employee after the employment for which credit is being 20established and the rates then applicable to alternative 21formula employees, plus (2) an amount determined by the Board 22to be the employer's normal cost of the benefits accrued for 23the credit being established, plus (3) regular interest on the 24amounts in items (1) and (2) from the first day as an 25alternative formula employee after the employment for which 26credit is being established to the date of payment.   SB1461- 92 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-956, eff. 5-27-22; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (40 ILCS 5/14-152.1)4    Sec. 14-152.1. Application and expiration of new benefit 5increases.6    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 7an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 8Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for 9any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 10to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 11effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase", 12however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 13the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 1496-37, Public Act 100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 15100-611, Public Act 101-10, Public Act 101-610, Public Act 16102-210, Public Act 102-856, Public Act 102-956, or this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly this amendatory 18Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 19    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 20any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 21increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 22granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 23compliance with the provisions of this Section. 24    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 25identify and provide for payment to the System of additional   SB1461- 93 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 2increase in cost to the System as it accrues.3    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 4Assembly providing the additional funding required under this 5subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 6Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional 7funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 8shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 9the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 10a Public Act that does not include the additional funding 11required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 12Pension Division determines that the additional funding 13provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is 14or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 15the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 16by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 17at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is 18made. 19    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 20its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 21in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 22under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 23Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 24by law.25    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 26the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires   SB1461- 94 -LRB104 08589 RPS 18641 b1under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 2and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 3increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 4alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any 5other person, including, without limitation, a person who 6continues in service after the expiration date and did not 7apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 8benefit increase was in effect.9(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 10101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-856, eff. 111-1-23; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22.) 12    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 13Section 8.49 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)15    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 168 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 17the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 18Act of the 104th General Assembly. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.